Indiana, session 2026, HB1104.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-28-5-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) This section applies to agreements or contracts
for economic development entered into after June 30, 2026, that
contain economic development provisions, including:
(1) tax incentives;
(2) payments in lieu of taxes;
(3) tax abatements;
(4) bonds;
(5) notes;
(6) loans;
(7) grants;
(8) rebates; or
(9) any other economic development incentive.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the corporation, the state,
any instrumentality of the state, or any other public authority, or
any party negotiating on behalf of the corporation, the state, any
2026 IN 1104—LS 6262/DI 134


instrumentality of the state, or any other public authority, may not
enter into an agreement or contract for economic development
described in subsection (a) that contains any provision, clause, or
language that provides that the agreement or contract, or any of its
terms, is confidential, or that the parties to the agreement or
contract are prohibited from disclosing, discussing, describing, or
commenting upon the terms of the agreement or contract.
2026 IN 1104—LS 6262/DI 134